Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 10 Shipwrecks

46-10-1.
Appointment of town commissioners of wrecks and shipwrecked goods — Bond.

The town council of every town, the territorial limits of which extend to the seashore, except the town of New Shoreham, shall annually appoint a commissioner of wrecks and shipwrecked goods, with power to appoint one or more deputies. Every commissioner of wrecks and shipwrecked goods shall give bond with sufficient surety or sureties to the town treasurer of the town wherein the commissioner shall be appointed, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the faithful performance of the duties of the commissioner’s office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-1

.

46-10-2.
Commissioner to take charge of wrecked property.

The commissioner shall, immediately on receiving information of any shipwreck within his or her jurisdiction or of the finding of any shipwrecked goods or property of any kind in value to the amount of twenty dollars ($20.00) or more upon the shore, repair to the place where the property may be found, and, in case the property shall not be in the custody of the owner or an agent of the owner, the commissioner shall take charge of the property and shall preserve and secure the property for the owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-2

.

46-10-3.
Employment of assistants by commissioner — Disobedience of orders.

The commissioner, if he or she thinks it is necessary, may employ persons to assist in preserving the property, may appoint guards to secure the property, and may suppress all tumults and disorders. If any person shall disobey any lawful order of the commissioner given in discharging the duties of his or her office, the person shall, for every offense, forfeit twenty dollars ($20.00), to be recovered in an action in the name of the commissioner to the use of the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-3

.

46-10-4.
Inventory of property — Compensation and reimbursement of commissioner.

The commissioner shall, upon finding any wreck or shipwrecked goods, take an inventory of all the property that shall come into his or her possession; and, whenever required by the owner of the property or the owner’s agent or by any insurance company or underwriter or other person interested in the property, he or she shall make an oath to the truth of the inventory and shall deliver a copy thereof, together with all the property to the owner, agent, or other person lawfully authorized to receive it; provided, that there shall be paid or secured to be paid to the commissioner a reasonable compensation for the commissioner’s services and expenses and any customhouse duties and other charges, if any, that he or she shall have paid or become liable to pay on or for the property in question.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 199, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-4

.

46-10-5.
Arbitration of amount due commissioner — Action at law.

If the commissioner and the other party shall not agree on the sum so due the commissioner, the matter in dispute may be submitted to three (3) arbitrators selected from the citizens of the state, for settlement; one of the arbitrators shall be chosen by the commissioner, one by the other party, and the third by the two (2) already selected. If the parties shall not agree to submit the case to arbitrators, or if the case is submitted and either party is dissatisfied with the decision of the arbitrators, the case may be decided in a civil action, to be commenced and prosecuted as the circumstances may require, unless the case shall be a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-5

.

46-10-6.
Compensation due persons other than commissioner — Appeal.

No owner or other person interested in any shipwrecked goods shall be held to pay to any person, other than the commissioner, any charge for services or expenses in taking or securing the property, unless it be for property taken or secured before the arrival of the commissioner, in which case the commissioner shall, upon due hearing of all parties interested, determine the compensation to be received; and any party dissatisfied with the award of the commissioner may appeal therefrom according to the provisions of law with reference to appeals from town councils for the county in which the wreck or shipwrecked goods may be found.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 23; C.P.A. 1905, § 1123; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-6

.

46-10-7.
Penalty for unauthorized intermeddling with property.

Every person who shall after the arrival of the commissioner take, detain, or intermeddle with any property shipwrecked or found as aforesaid, except under the direction of the commissioner or of the owner, agent, or other person interested, provided, that the owner, agent, or other person interested, has possession of the property, shall forfeit one thousand dollars ($1,000) for such offense, to be recovered in the name of the commissioner, one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the commissioner and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the person lawfully authorized to receive the property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-7

.

46-10-8.
Publication of notice of finding of wreck.

The commissioner, as soon as may be after a wreck or shipwrecked goods shall be found, shall publish the particulars of the shipwreck or goods found, with any other material facts that he or she shall ascertain, in some daily newspaper published in the city of Providence, in order that knowledge thereof may be given as soon as possible to the owner, agent, or person interested; and if the commissioner shall neglect to do so, he or she shall forfeit one hundred dollars ($100), to be recovered in an action at the suit of the owner, agent, or person interested, to his or her own use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-8

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 113.

46-10-9.
Sale of property to pay duties.

The commissioner may, within thirty (30) days after taking into his or her custody the property so found, sell at public auction so much thereof as shall be sufficient to pay all duties thereon, which he or she shall have paid or for which he or she shall become liable to the customhouse.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-9

.

46-10-10.
Sale of perishable goods or goods subject to reduction in value — Accounting.

If the shipwrecked goods found be of a perishable nature or be much reduced in value by keeping, and if no owner or agent or other person interested appear to take the goods, the commissioner shall immediately advertise the goods in one of the daily newspapers published in the city of Providence, and also by posting notices in the town in which the goods shall be so found, and shall within six (6) days sell the goods at public auction to the highest bidder; and the commissioner shall within twenty (20) days after the sale render a just and true account in writing, subscribed by the commissioner to the town treasurer, of all the goods sold by the commissioner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-10

.

46-10-11.
Inventory and accounting for unclaimed property — Delivery to town.

If no owner or agent or other person interested in the shipwrecked property shall appear and establish his or her claim within one year after it shall have been taken into the custody of the commissioner, the commissioner shall render to the town treasurer of the town an inventory of the property, and, if sold, an account of all money in the commissioner’s hands and paid by the commissioner for duties on the property and for expenses of securing and preserving the property, and the commissioner shall make an oath to the truth of the inventory and account and shall pay and deliver the balance of the account, with all the property remaining in the commissioner’s hands, to the town treasurer for the use of the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-11

.

46-10-12.
Compensation of commissioner for property delivered to town.

The town council may grant the commissioner such compensation for his or her services and expenses as shall be just, to be ascertained, in case of disagreement between the commissioner and town council, in the same manner as provided in §

46-10-5

for the adjustment of the like question between the commissioner and the owner of the property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-12

.

46-10-13.
Suit by town for unclaimed property.

If the commissioner shall, for the space for sixty (60) days after the expiration of the year limited for the commissioner’s accounting to the town treasurer in §

46-10-11

, neglect to present his or her inventory and account before mentioned and to pay and deliver the balance due thereon, together with all the property remaining in the commissioner’s hands, the town treasurer shall cause a suit to be commenced in the treasurer’s name therefor for the use of the town, and shall prosecute the suit to final judgment and execution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-13

.

46-10-14.
Bond of director.

The director of the department of environmental management shall give bond to the general treasurer for the faithful discharge of the director’s duty under this chapter with sufficient sureties to the acceptance of the general treasurer, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000); and any person, having a claim against the director for any breach or neglect of the director’s official duty, may have a remedy therefor by a suit on his or her bond, to be prosecuted in the name of the general treasurer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-14

.

46-10-15.
Taking charge of property wrecked on Block Island.

The director of the department of environmental management shall, immediately on receiving information of any shipwreck or of the finding of any shipwrecked goods or property of any kind in value to the amount of twenty dollars ($20.00) or more upon the shore of Block Island, repair to the place where the property may be found, and in case the property shall not be in the custody of any owner or agent, the director shall take charge thereof and shall preserve and secure the property for the owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-15

.

46-10-16.
Employment of assistants by director.

The director of the department of environmental management, upon taking charge of unclaimed property, may employ as many persons as the director shall think necessary to assist in preserving the property, and he or she may appoint guards to secure the property and may suppress all tumults and disorders.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-16

.

46-10-17.
Appointment of agent for director.

In case the director of the department of environmental management shall be absent from the island or shall be unable, from sickness or other cause, to attend to the duties of his or her office, the director may appoint some other person in the town of New Shoreham to act in his or her stead as commissioner of wrecks, while the absence or inability shall exist. The person so appointed or authorized shall be clothed with all the rights and powers which the director has under this chapter; for which the director shall be as fully responsible as if the acts were performed by himself or herself.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-17

.

46-10-18.
Penalty for disobedience of order of director.

Every person who shall disobey any lawful order of the director of the department of environmental management, given in discharging the duties of the director’s office, shall forfeit for every such offense twenty dollars ($20.00), to be recovered in an action in the name of the director, to the use of the town of New Shoreham.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-18

.

46-10-19.
Inventory of property wrecked on Block Island — Reimbursement of director.

The director of the department of environmental management shall on every such occasion take an inventory of all the property that shall come into the director’s possession; and whenever required by the owner of the property or the owner’s agent or by any insurance company or underwriter or other person interested in the property, the director shall make an oath to the truth of the inventory, and shall deliver a copy thereof, together with all the property, to the owner, agent, or other person lawfully authorized to receive it; provided, that there shall be paid or secured to be paid to the director a reasonable compensation for his or her services and expenses, and the customhouse duties and other charges, if any, as he or she shall have paid or become liable to pay on or for the property in question.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-19

.

46-10-20.
Arbitration of amounts due director.

If the director of the department of environmental management and the other party shall not agree on the sum so due the director, the case may be submitted to three (3) arbitrators for settlement; one of the arbitrators shall be chosen by the director, one by the other party, and the third by the two (2) already selected; they shall be citizens of the state and, unless objection is raised by the director or the other party, resident voters of the town of New Shoreham. If objection is made to the selection of inhabitants of that town for the service in any case, then selection may be made of any three (3) resident voters in the county of Newport.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-20

.

46-10-21.
Action for amounts due director.

If the parties shall not agree to submit the case to arbitrators, or if the case is submitted and either party is dissatisfied with the decision of the arbitrators, then the case may be decided in a civil action to be commenced and prosecuted as the circumstances may require, unless the case shall be a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-21

.

46-10-22.
Amounts due parties other than director — Appeal.

No owner or other person interested in any property wrecked on Block Island shall be held to pay to any person other than the director of the department of environmental management any charge for services or expenses in taking or securing the property, unless it be for property taken or secured before the arrival of the director; in which case the director shall upon due hearing of all parties interested, determine the compensation to be received as aforesaid, and any party dissatisfied with the award of the director may obtain a judicial review under the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-22

.

46-10-23.
Penalty for unauthorized intermeddling with property.

If any person shall, after the arrival of the director of the department of environmental management, take, detain, or intermeddle with any property shipwrecked or found as aforesaid, except under the direction of the director or of the owner or agent or other person interested, he or she shall forfeit one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense, to be recovered in the name of the director, owner, agent, or other person interested, to his or her own use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-23

.

46-10-24.
Publication of notice of wreck found on Block Island.

The director of the department of environmental management, as soon as may be after the director’s arrival at the place where any wreck or goods shall be found, shall publish the particulars of the shipwreck and of the goods found, with such other material facts as the director shall ascertain, in the newspapers published in the city of Newport, in order that knowledge thereof may be given as soon as possible to the owner, agent, or person interested; and if the director shall neglect so to do, he or she shall forfeit fifty dollars ($50.00), to be recovered in an action at the suit of the owner, agent, or other person interested, to his or her own use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-24

.

46-10-25.
Sale of property to pay duties — Perishable property.

The director of the department of environmental management may dispose of so much of the property by public auction, within thirty (30) days after taking the property into his or her custody, as shall be sufficient to pay all duties thereon which he or she shall have paid, or for which the director shall become liable, to the customhouse, and may dispose of any property which is of a perishable nature.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-25

.

46-10-26.
Sale of property subject to reduction in value.

Whenever the property wrecked on Block Island may be much reduced in value by keeping it for one year, and no owner, agent or other person interested therein shall appear to claim it within sixty (60) days after it shall have been taken into the custody of the director of the department of environmental management, the director shall advertise the property in the public newspapers in the city of Newport and shall sell the property by auction to the best advantage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-26

.

46-10-27.
Inventory and accounting for unclaimed property — Delivery to treasurer.

If no owner, agent, or other person interested in the property wrecked on Block Island shall appear within one year after it shall have been taken into the custody of the director of the department of environmental management, and establish his or her claim thereto, the director shall present to the general treasurer an inventory of the property (or, if sold, an account of all the sales) with an account of all the moneys paid by him or her for duties on the property and for the expenses of securing and preserving it; and he or she shall make an oath to the truth of the inventory and accounts, and shall pay and deliver to the general treasurer the balance of the accounts, with all the property remaining in the director’s hands, to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-27

.

46-10-28.
Director of the department of environmental management — Salary and expenses.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary, for the salary of the director of the department of environmental management and for his or her expenses.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 119, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 145, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 150, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-28

.

46-10-29.
Provisions limited to wrecks in New Shoreham.

The provisions of §§

46-10-14

—

46-10-28

shall apply only insofar as the director of the department of environmental management may be performing the duties and exercising the powers of the former commissioner of wrecks in New Shoreham.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 115, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-10-29

.